test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tests_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - čavos: # 2A
    čavos+N+Sg+Nom: čavos
    čavos+N+Sg+Gen: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Acc: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Ill: čaposân
    čavos+N+Sg+Loc: čaposist
    čavos+N+Sg+Com: čaposáin
    čavos+N+Sg+Abe: čappoosttáá
    čavos+N+Ess: [čaposin, čavosin]
    čavos+N+Par: [čaposid, čavosid]
    čavos+N+Pl+Nom: čaposeh
    čavos+N+Pl+Gen: čaposij
    čavos+N+Pl+Acc: čaposijd
    čavos+N+Pl+Ill: čaposáid
    čavos+N+Pl+Loc: čaposijn
    čavos+N+Pl+Com: čaposijguin
    čavos+N+Pl+Abe: čaposijttáá



  Noun - njuođâs: # 2A
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Nom: njuođâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Gen: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Acc: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Ill: njuo´tâsân
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Loc: njuo´tâsist
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Com: njuo´tâsáin
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Abe: njuottâsttáá
    njuođâs+N+Ess: [njuođâsin, njuo´tâsin]
    njuođâs+N+Par: [njuođâsid, njuo´tâsid]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Nom: [njuo´tâseh, njuottâseh]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Gen: [njuo´tâsij, njuottâsij]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Acc: [njuo´tâsijd, njuot'tâsijd]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Ill: [njuo´tâsáid, njuot'tâsáid]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Loc: [njuo´tâsijn, njuot'tâsijn]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Com: [njuo´tâsijguin, njuot'tâsijguin]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Abe: [njuo´tâsijttáá, njuot'tâsijttáá]


  Noun - päävir: # 2A
    päävir+N+Sg+Nom: päävir
    päävir+N+Sg+Gen: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Acc: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Ill: pápárân
    päävir+N+Sg+Loc: pápárist
    päävir+N+Sg+Com: pápáráin
    päävir+N+Sg+Abe: pááppárttáá
    päävir+N+Ess: [pápárin, pävirin]
    päävir+N+Par: [pápárid, pävirid]
    päävir+N+Pl+Nom: pápáreh
    päävir+N+Pl+Gen: pápárij
    päävir+N+Pl+Acc: pápárijd
    päävir+N+Pl+Ill: pápáráid
    päävir+N+Pl+Loc: pápárijn
    päävir+N+Pl+Com: pápárijguin
    päävir+N+Pl+Abe: pápárijttáá

  Noun - kielâs: # 2A
    kielâs+N+Sg+Nom: kielâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Gen: kiellas
    kielâs+N+Sg+Acc: kiellâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Ill: kie´lâsân
    kielâs+N+Sg+Loc: kie´lâsist
    kielâs+N+Sg+Com: kie´lâsáin
    kielâs+N+Sg+Abe: kiellâsttáá
    kielâs+N+Ess: [kie´lâsin, kielâsin, kiellâsin]
    kielâs+N+Par: [kie´lâsid, kielâsid, kiellâsid]
    kielâs+N+Pl+Nom: kie´lâseh
    kielâs+N+Pl+Gen: kie´lâsij
    kielâs+N+Pl+Acc: kie´lâsijd
    kielâs+N+Pl+Ill: kie´lâsáid
    kielâs+N+Pl+Loc: kie´lâsijn
    kielâs+N+Pl+Com: kie´lâsijguin
    kielâs+N+Pl+Abe: kiel´lâsijttáá

  Noun - lye´me: # eres
    lye´me+N+Sg+Nom: lye´me
    lye´me+N+Sg+Gen: luámmán
    lye´me+N+Sg+Acc: luámmán
    lye´me+N+Sg+Ill: luá´mánân
    lye´me+N+Sg+Loc: luá´mánist
    lye´me+N+Sg+Com: luá´mánáin
    lye´me+N+Sg+Abe: luámmánttáá
    lye´me+N+Ess: [luá´mánin, lyemeen]
    lye´me+N+Par: [luá´mánid, lyemeed]
    lye´me+N+Pl+Nom: luá´máneh
    lye´me+N+Pl+Gen: luá´mánij
    lye´me+N+Pl+Acc: luá´mánijd
    lye´me+N+Pl+Ill: luá´mánáid
    lye´me+N+Pl+Loc: luá´mánijn
    lye´me+N+Pl+Com: luá´mánijguin
    lye´me+N+Pl+Abe: luá´mánijttáá



  Noun - siämu: # eres
    siämu+N+Sg+Nom: siämu
    siämu+N+Sg+Gen: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Acc: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Ill: siä´munân
    siämu+N+Sg+Loc: siä´munist
    siämu+N+Sg+Com: siä´munáin
    siämu+N+Sg+Abe: siämmunttáá
    siämu+N+Ess: [siämun, siä´munin]
    siämu+N+Par: [siämud, siä´munid]
    siämu+N+Pl+Nom: siä´muneh
    siämu+N+Pl+Gen: siä´munij
    siämu+N+Pl+Acc: siä´munijd
    siämu+N+Pl+Ill: siä´munáid
    siämu+N+Pl+Loc: siä´munijn
    siämu+N+Pl+Com: siä´munijguin
    siämu+N+Pl+Abe: siä´munijttáá



  Noun - vaaskâ: # eres
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Nom: vaaskâ
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaskâm
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaskâm
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaskâmân
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaskâmist
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Com: vaskâmáin
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Abe: vaskâmttáá
    vaaskâ+N+Ess: [vaskâmin, vaaskân]
    vaaskâ+N+Par: [vaskâmid, vaaskâd]
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaskâmeh
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Gen: vaskâmij
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaskâmijd
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Ill: vaskâmáid
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaskâmijn
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Com: vaskâmijguin
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Abe: vaskâmijttáá


  Noun - siemâ: # eres
    siemâ+N+Sg+Nom: siemâ
    siemâ+N+Sg+Gen: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Acc: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Ill: sie´mânân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Loc: sie´mânist
    siemâ+N+Sg+Com: sie´mânáin
    siemâ+N+Sg+Abe: siemmânttáá
    siemâ+N+Ess: [siemân, sie´mânin]
    siemâ+N+Par: [siemâd, sie´mânid]
    siemâ+N+Pl+Nom: sie´mâneh
    siemâ+N+Pl+Gen: sie´mânij
    siemâ+N+Pl+Acc: sie´mânijd
    siemâ+N+Pl+Ill: sie´mânáid
    siemâ+N+Pl+Loc: sie´mânijn
    siemâ+N+Pl+Com: sie´mânijguin
    siemâ+N+Pl+Abe: sie´mânijttáá


  Noun - čeve: # eres
    čeve+N+Sg+Nom: čeve
    čeve+N+Sg+Gen: čiäp´pát
    čeve+N+Sg+Acc: čiäp´pát
    čeve+N+Sg+Ill: čiä´páttân
    čeve+N+Sg+Loc: čiä´páttist
    čeve+N+Sg+Com: čiä´páttáin
    čeve+N+Sg+Abe: čiä´ppáttáá
    čeve+N+Ess: [čiä´páttin, čeeveen]
    čeve+N+Par: [čiä´páttid, čeeveed]
    čeve+N+Pl+Nom: čiä´pátteh
    čeve+N+Pl+Gen: čiä´páttij
    čeve+N+Pl+Acc: čiä´páttijd
    čeve+N+Pl+Ill: čiä´páttáid
    čeve+N+Pl+Loc: čiä´páttijn
    čeve+N+Pl+Com: čiä´páttijguin
    čeve+N+Pl+Abe: čiä´páttijttáá

  Noun - njuovčâ: # eres
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuovčâ
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuoh´čâm
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuoh´čâm
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuoh´čâmân
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuoh´čâmist
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Com: njuoh´čâmáin
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuoh´čâmttáá
    njuovčâ+N+Ess: [njuoh´čâmin, njuovčân]
    njuovčâ+N+Par: [njuoh´čâmid, njuovčâd]
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuoh´čâmeh
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Gen: njuoh´čâmij
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuoh´čâmijd
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuoh´čâmáid
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuoh´čâmijn
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Com: njuoh´čâmijguin
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuoh´čâmijttáá

  Noun - soovsâ: # eres
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Nom: soovsâ
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Gen: soksâm
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Acc: soksâm
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Ill: soksâmân
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Loc: soksâmist
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Com: soksâmáin
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Abe: soksâmttáá
    soovsâ+N+Ess: [soksâmin, soovsân]
    soovsâ+N+Par: [soksâmid, soovsâd]
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Nom: soksâmeh
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Gen: soksâmij
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Acc: soksâmijd
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Ill: soksâmáid
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Loc: soksâmijn
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Com: soksâmijguin
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Abe: soksâmijttáá
